Nebraska, session 109, LB1255.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1255 LB1255
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
beginning on the effective date of this act, public power suppliers shall
be prohibited from exercising the power of eminent domain.
(2) For purposes of this section, public power supplier means a
public power district, a municipal electric utility, or any other
government entity providing electric service.
Sec. 2. Section 70-670, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
70-670 (1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this
section, in (1) In addition to any other rights and powers conferred upon
any district organized under or subject to Chapter 70, article 6, each
such district shall have and exercise the power of eminent domain to
acquire from any person, firm, association, or private corporation any
and all property owned, used, or operated, or useful for operation, in
the generation, transmission, or distribution of electrical energy,
including an existing electric utility system or any part thereof. The
procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth
in Chapter 76, article 7.
(b) (2) In the case of the acquisition through the exercise of the
power of eminent domain of an existing electric utility system or part
thereof, the Attorney General shall, upon request of any district,
represent such district in the institution and prosecution of
condemnation proceedings. After acquisition of an existing electric
utility system through the exercise of the power of eminent domain, the
district shall reimburse the state for all costs and expenses incurred in
the condemnation proceedings by the Attorney General.
(c) (3) A district may agree to limit its exercise of the power of
eminent domain to acquire a project which is a renewable energy
generation facility producing electricity with wind and any related
facilities.
(d) (4) No property owned, used, or operated as part of a privately
-2-

LB1255 LB1255
2026 2026
developed renewable energy generation facility meeting the requirements
of section 70-1014.02 shall be subject to eminent domain by any consumer-
owned electric supplier operating in the State of Nebraska.
(2) A district shall not exercise the power of eminent domain
pursuant to this section on or after the effective date of this act.
Sec. 3. Section 70-1409, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
70-1409 Each joint authority shall have all the rights and powers
necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and
provisions of the Joint Public Power Authority Act including, but not
limited to, the right and power:
(1) To adopt bylaws for the regulation of the affairs and the
conduct of its business and to prescribe rules, regulations, and policies
in connection with the performance of its functions and duties;
(2) To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure;
(3) To maintain an office at such place or places as it may
determine;
(4) To sue and be sued in its own name and to plead and be
impleaded;
(5) To receive, administer, and comply with the conditions and
requirements respecting any gift, grant, or donation of any property or
money;
(6) To acquire by purchase, lease, gift, or otherwise, or to obtain
options for the acquisition of, any property, real or personal, improved
or unimproved, including an interest in land less than an interest in
fee;
(7) To sell, lease, exchange, transfer, or otherwise dispose of, or
to grant options for any such purposes with respect to, any real or
personal property or interest in such property;
(8) To pledge or assign any money, rents, charges, or other revenue
and any proceeds derived by the joint authority from the sales of
-3-

LB1255 LB1255
2026 2026
property, insurance, or condemnation awards;
(9) To issue bonds of the joint authority for the purpose of
providing funds for any of its corporate purposes;
(10) To authorize the construction, operation, or maintenance of any
project or projects by any person, firm, or corporation, including
political subdivisions and agencies of any state or of the United States;
(11) To acquire by negotiated purchase or lease an existing project,
a project under construction, or other property, either individually or
jointly, with one or more public power districts in this state or with
any political subdivisions or agencies of this state or any other state
or with other joint authorities created pursuant to the Joint Public
Power Authority Act;
(12) To dispose of by negotiated sale or lease an existing project,
a project under construction, or other property, either individually or
jointly, with one or more public power districts in this state, with any
political subdivisions or agencies of this state or any other state or,
with other joint authorities created pursuant to the Joint Public Power
Authority Act, except that no such sale or lease of any project located
in this state shall be made to any private person, firm, or corporation
engaged in the business of generating, transmitting, or distributing
electricity for profit;
(13) To fix, charge, and collect rents, rates, fees, and charges for
electric power or energy, hydrogen, or ethanol and other services,
facilities, and commodities sold, furnished, or supplied through any
project;
(14) To generate, produce, transmit, deliver, exchange, purchase, or
sell for resale only electric power or energy, to produce, store,
deliver, or distribute hydrogen for use in fuel processes, or to produce,
deliver, or distribute ethanol and to enter into contracts for any or all
such purposes, subject to sections 70-1410 and 70-1413;
(15) To negotiate and enter into contracts for the purchase,
-4-

LB1255 LB1255
2026 2026
exchange, interchange, wheeling, pooling, or transmission of electric
power and energy with any public power district, any other joint
authority, any political subdivision or agency of this state or any other
state, any electric cooperative, or any municipal agency which owns
electric generation, transmission, or distribution facilities in this
state or any other state;
(16) To negotiate and enter into contracts for the sale or use of
electric power and energy, hydrogen, or ethanol with any joint authority,
electric cooperative, any political subdivision or agency or any public
or private electric utility of this state or any other state, any joint
agency, electric cooperative, municipality, public or private electric
utility, or any state or federal agency or political subdivision, subject
to sections 70-1410 and 70-1413;
(17) To make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary
or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the joint
authority under the Joint Public Power Authority Act, including contracts
with persons, firms, corporations, and others;
(18) To apply to the appropriate agencies of the state, the United
States, or any other state and to any other proper agency for such
permits, licenses, certificates, or approvals as may be necessary to
construct, maintain, and operate projects in accordance with such
licenses, permits, certificates, or approvals, and to obtain, hold, and
use the same rights granted in any licenses, permits, certificates, or
approvals as any other person or operating unit would have under such
documents;
(19) To employ engineers, architects, attorneys, appraisers,
financial advisors, and such other consultants and employees as may be
required in the judgment of the joint authority and to fix and pay their
compensation from funds available to the joint authority. The joint
authority may employ technical experts and such other officers, agents,
and employees as it may require and shall assess their qualifications,
-5-

LB1255 LB1255
2026 2026
duties, compensation, and term of office. The board may delegate to one
or more of the joint authority's employees or agents such powers and
duties as the board may deem proper;
(20) To make loans or advances for long-term, supplemental, short-
term, and interim financing for both capital projects and operational
purposes to those member districts on such terms and conditions as the
board of directors of the joint authority may deem necessary and to
secure such loans or advances by assignment of revenue, receivables, or
other sums of the member district and such other security as the board of
directors of the joint authority may determine; and
(21) To sell, lease, or license its dark fiber pursuant to sections
86-574 to 86-578.
Any joint authority shall have the same power of eminent domain as
the public power districts have under section 70-670.
Sec. 4. Original section 70-670, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 70-1409, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-6-